Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-14,103.02
Contract with officer; information required; ledger maintained.

(1) The person charged with keeping records for each governing body shall maintain separately from other records a ledger containing the information listed in subdivisions (1)(a) through (e) of this section about every contract entered into by the governing body in which an officer of the body has an interest and for which disclosure is made pursuant to section 49-14,103.01. Such information shall be kept in the ledger for five years from the date of the officer's last day in office and shall include the:

(a) Names of the contracting parties;

(b) Nature of the interest of the officer in question;

(c) Date that the contract was approved by the governing body;

(d) Amount of the contract; and

(e) Basic terms of the contract.

(2) The information supplied relative to the contract shall be provided no later than ten days after the contract has been signed by both parties. The ledger kept pursuant to this section shall be available for public inspection during the normal working hours of the office in which it is kept.

Laws 1986, LB 548, § 3;

Laws 2001, LB 242, § 22;

Laws 2005, LB 242, § 49.